Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.260

State board for volunteer firefighters and reserve officers—Meetings—Quorum.

The state board shall hold regular semiannual meetings in April and October of each year, and special meetings not more than once monthly at such times and places as may be called by the chair or by two of its members. No action shall be taken by the state board without the approval of two members.

[ 2012 c 117 s 38; 1955 c 263 s 3.]